Other/Precision Software/Precision Lang Suite/Editor/Extras/Hunspell/Dictionaries/gl.aff
SFX Z Y 166
SFX Z   uxir oxes         uxir
SFX Z   uxir oxen         uxir
SFX Z   uxir oxe          uxir
SFX Z   ulir oles         ulir
SFX Z   ulir olen         ulir
SFX Z   ulir ole          ulir
SFX Z   udir odes         udir
SFX Z   udir oden         udir
SFX Z   udir ode          udir
SFX Z   r    s            ler
SFX Z   r    n            ler
SFX Z   r    mos          uxir
SFX Z   r    mos          ulir
SFX Z   r    mos          udir
SFX Z   r    mos          olir
SFX Z   r    mos          obrir
SFX Z   r    mos          ler
SFX Z   r    mos          etir
SFX Z   r    mos          estir
SFX Z   r    mos          ertir
SFX Z   r    mos          ernir
SFX Z   r    mos          erir
SFX Z   r    mos          entir
SFX Z   r    mos          elir
SFX Z   r    mos          eguir
SFX Z   r    mos          edir
SFX Z   r    des          uxir
SFX Z   r    des          ulir
SFX Z   r    des          udir
SFX Z   r    des          olir
SFX Z   r    des          obrir
SFX Z   r    des          ler
SFX Z   r    des          etir
SFX Z   r    des          estir
SFX Z   r    des          ertir
SFX Z   r    des          ernir
SFX Z   r    des          erir
SFX Z   r    des          entir
SFX Z   r    des          elir
SFX Z   r    des          eguir
SFX Z   r    des          edir
SFX Z   olir ulo          olir
SFX Z   olir ulas         olir
SFX Z   olir ulan         olir
SFX Z   olir ulamos       olir
SFX Z   olir ulades       olir
SFX Z   olir ula          olir
SFX Z   obrir ubro         obrir
SFX Z   obrir ubras        obrir
SFX Z   obrir ubran        obrir
SFX Z   obrir ubramos      obrir
SFX Z   obrir ubrades      obrir
SFX Z   obrir ubra         obrir
SFX Z   ir   o            uxir
SFX Z   ir   o            ulir
SFX Z   ir   o            udir
SFX Z   ir   es           olir
SFX Z   ir   es           obrir
SFX Z   ir   es           etir
SFX Z   ir   es           estir
SFX Z   ir   es           ertir
SFX Z   ir   es           ernir
SFX Z   ir   es           erir
SFX Z   ir   es           entir
SFX Z   ir   es           elir
SFX Z   ir   es           eguir
SFX Z   ir   es           edir
SFX Z   ir   en           olir
SFX Z   ir   en           obrir
SFX Z   ir   en           etir
SFX Z   ir   en           estir
SFX Z   ir   en           ertir
SFX Z   ir   en           ernir
SFX Z   ir   en           erir
SFX Z   ir   en           entir
SFX Z   ir   en           elir
SFX Z   ir   en           eguir
SFX Z   ir   en           edir
SFX Z   ir   e            olir
SFX Z   ir   e            obrir
SFX Z   ir   e            etir
SFX Z   ir   e            estir
SFX Z   ir   e            ertir
SFX Z   ir   e            ernir
SFX Z   ir   e            erir
SFX Z   ir   e            entir
SFX Z   ir   e            elir
SFX Z   ir   e            eguir
SFX Z   ir   e            edir
SFX Z   ir   as           uxir
SFX Z   ir   as           ulir
SFX Z   ir   as           udir
SFX Z   ir   an           uxir
SFX Z   ir   an           ulir
SFX Z   ir   an           udir
SFX Z   ir   amos         uxir
SFX Z   ir   amos         ulir
SFX Z   ir   amos         udir
SFX Z   ir   ades         uxir
SFX Z   ir   ades         ulir
SFX Z   ir   ades         udir
SFX Z   ir   a            uxir
SFX Z   ir   a            ulir
SFX Z   ir   a            udir
SFX Z   etir ito          etir
SFX Z   etir itas         etir
SFX Z   etir itan         etir
SFX Z   etir itamos       etir
SFX Z   etir itades       etir
SFX Z   etir ita          etir
SFX Z   estir isto        estir
SFX Z   estir istas       estir
SFX Z   estir istan       estir
SFX Z   estir istamos     estir
SFX Z   estir istades     estir
SFX Z   estir ista        estir
SFX Z   ertir irto        ertir
SFX Z   ertir irtas       ertir
SFX Z   ertir irtan       ertir
SFX Z   ertir irtamos     ertir
SFX Z   ertir irtades     ertir
SFX Z   ertir irta        ertir
SFX Z   ernir irno        ernir
SFX Z   ernir irnas       ernir
SFX Z   ernir irnan       ernir
SFX Z   ernir irnamos     ernir
SFX Z   ernir irnades     ernir
SFX Z   ernir irna        ernir
SFX Z   erir iro          erir
SFX Z   erir iras         erir
SFX Z   erir iran         erir
SFX Z   erir iramos       erir
SFX Z   erir irades       erir
SFX Z   erir ira          erir
SFX Z   er   é            ler
SFX Z   er   lo           ler
SFX Z   er   las          ler
SFX Z   er   lan          ler
SFX Z   er   lamos        ler
SFX Z   er   lades        ler
SFX Z   er   la           ler
SFX Z   er   e            ler
SFX Z   entir into         entir
SFX Z   entir intas        entir
SFX Z   entir intan        entir
SFX Z   entir intamos      entir
SFX Z   entir intades      entir
SFX Z   entir inta         entir
SFX Z   elir ilo          elir
SFX Z   elir ilas         elir
SFX Z   elir ilan         elir
SFX Z   elir ilamos       elir
SFX Z   elir ilades       elir
SFX Z   elir ila          elir
SFX Z   eguir igo          eguir
SFX Z   eguir igas         eguir
SFX Z   eguir igan         eguir
SFX Z   eguir igamos       eguir
SFX Z   eguir igades       eguir
SFX Z   eguir iga          eguir
SFX Z   edir ido          edir
SFX Z   edir idas         edir
SFX Z   edir idan         edir
SFX Z   edir idamos       edir
SFX Z   edir idades       edir
SFX Z   edir ida          edir
