Other/Precision Software/Precision Lang Suite/Editor/Extras/Hunspell/Dictionaries/gl.dic
acudir/YpZD
aderir/nZYvp
cobrir/ZYMSp
concernir/ZYnp
conseguir/ZYDvpM
demolir/ZYDpo
discernir/nYvZMp
dixerir/vZYp
expelir/nZYp
medir/ZYSp
mentir/SZYp
repelir/nYZp
subterfuxir/ZYp
suxerir/ZYvp
transfuxir/ZYp
advertir/ZYMp
animadvertir/ZYp
bulir/YpDRZ
conquerir/vZYDp
diferir/vZYpMn
equivaler/nYZp
investir/RZYMDp
repetir/ZYDcp
sacudir/ZYDMp
seguir/ZYMDvp
travestir/YZp
asentir/ZYMDXp
engolir/pZYDv
espedir/ZYp
expedir/cZYDpM
impelir/ZYpn
muxir/pYZD
pedir/pZYSIDM
preferir/YZvpn
presentir/ZYpM
proferir/ZYop
cernir/pZY
compelir/pZY
delir/ZYp
fuxir/ZYRp
inserir/ZYp
interferir/ZYpn
inxerir/YpZ
malferir/ZYp
perseguir/ZYDMvp
propelir/ZYnp
proseguir/pZYDoM
sentir/ZYMRp
vestir/IYRZp
abolir/XZYDpMcv
comedir/YvpZM
competir/ZYnDop
consentir/ZYDMp
divertir/ZYpM
encobrir/ZYMDp
enxerir/pZY
ferir/ZYDRIMp
reler/ZX
transferir/ZYDvp
ulir/pZYX
valer/ZYDMpnX
